Illinois, session 104th, HB4249.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5adding Section 10.28 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/10.28 new)7    Sec. 10.28. Training; law enforcement officer 8trauma-informed responses. 9    (a) The Board shall develop or approve a standard 10curriculum for certified training programs in the recognition 11of trauma-informed responses to traumatic events, adverse 12childhood experiences, and toxic stress among law enforcement. 13The training shall include:14        (1) teaching officers how to define and distinguish 15    between acute trauma, chronic trauma, cumulative 16    occupational stress, adverse childhood experiences, and 17    toxic stress;18        (2) teaching officers to recognize trauma-related 19    responses in themselves and others through behavioral, 20    cognitive, emotional, and physiological indicators of 21    traumatic stress, including how these indicators may 22    present during calls for service and during officer-public 23    interaction;  HB4249- 2 -LRB104 16615 RTM 30016 b1        (3) teaching officers the impact of trauma and how 2    occupational trauma exposure, moral injury, burnout, toxic 3    work environments, and cumulative stress affect decision 4    making, communication, performance, and well-being;5        (4) education on the effects of psychological safety 6    on organizational culture of law enforcement and the 7    immediate work environment;8        (5) ways to improve psychological safety through 9    trauma-informed communication and interaction skills, such 10    as reducing escalation and engaging peers and other 11    officers in a compassionate, culturally responsive, and 12    nonjudgmental manner;13        (6) techniques for compassionate, sensitive, and 14    nonjudgmental service delivery, including 15    trauma-responsive communication and de-escalation;16        (7) procedures for recognizing and responding to 17    traumatically triggering situations and emphasize tools 18    and techniques for achieving situationally optimal 19    outcomes; and20        (8) comprehensive strategies and tools to manage the 21    impact of trauma, cumulative occupational stress, adverse 22    childhood experiences and toxic stress.23    (b) The training required under this Section must be 24presented in all full and part-time basic law enforcement 25academies on or before July 1, 2027.26    (c) Law enforcement agencies must present the training   HB4249- 3 -LRB104 16615 RTM 30016 b1required under this Section to all law enforcement officers 2within 3 years after the effective date of this amendatory Act 3of the 104th General Assembly and, thereafter, at intervals 4established by the Board.5    (d) The Board shall evaluate training effectiveness 6through post-training assessments, ongoing officer feedback, 7wellness and safety metrics, and annual public reporting. The 8Board shall review and revise curricula and delivery methods 9as necessary to align with emerging research and agency needs.10    (e) Law enforcement agencies shall integrate 11trauma-informed care practices into policies, peer support 12programs, and officer resource referral procedures. Law 13enforcement agencies may build partnerships with community 14organizations and mental health professionals to support 15implementation and continuous development.